src/morphology/stems/altstem-verbs.lexc
LEXICON V_SUUNNATA
!! € suunnata
0:nat    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:nat    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:taa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:taa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:nat   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:nan   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:na   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:nat   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:nat   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_RYNNÄTÄ
!! € rynnätä
0:nät    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:nät    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:tää     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tää   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:täs   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:täs   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:nät   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:nän   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:nä   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:nät   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:nät   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_VIRRATA
!! € virrata
0:rat    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:rat    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:taa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:taa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ta   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:rat   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ran   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ra   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:rat   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:rat   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_HYLJÄTÄ
!! € hyljätä
0:jät    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:jät    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:kää     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kää   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:käs   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:käs   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:jät   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:jän   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:jä   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:jät   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:jät   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_DIGATA
!! € digata
0:at    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:at    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:gaa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:gaa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ga   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:gas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:gas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:at   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:an   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:at   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:at   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_LOBATA
!! € lobata
0:at    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:at    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:baa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:baa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ba   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:bas   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:bas   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:at   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:an   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:a   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:at   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:at   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_KARHUTA
!! € karhuta
0:t    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:t    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:a     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:a   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:a   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:s   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:t   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_TÄHYTÄ
!! € tähytä
0:t    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:t    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:ä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:ä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:s   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:s   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:n   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:t   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_KAIKOTA
!! € kaikota
0:ot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:koa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:koa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:koa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:kos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:on   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_POIKETA
!! € poiketa
0:et    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:et    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kea     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kea   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kea   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:kes   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kes   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:et   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:en   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:et   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_KERETÄ
!! € keretä
0:et    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:et    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:keä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:keä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:keä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:kes   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kes   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:en   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:e   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:et   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_KOUKUTA
!! € koukuta
0:ut    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ut    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kua     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kua   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kua   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:kus   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kus   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:un   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:u   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_PULPUTA
!! € pulputa
0:ut    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ut    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pua     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pua   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pua   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pus   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pus   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:un   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:u   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_UPOTA
!! € upota
0:ot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:poa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:poa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:poa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:on   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_LOTOTA
!! € lotota
0:ot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:toa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:toa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:toa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:on   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:o   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_LUUTUTA
!! € luututa
0:ut    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:ut    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:tua     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tua   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tua   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tus   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tus   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:un   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:u   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:ut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_KIVUTA
!! € kivuta
0:vut    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:vut    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pua     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pua   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pua   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pus   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pus   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:vut   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:vun   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:vu   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vut   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:vut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_KORVETA
!! € korveta
0:vet    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:vet    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pea     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pea   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pea   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pes   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pes   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:vet   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ven   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ve   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vet   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:vet   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_REVETÄ
!! € kiivetä
0:vet    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:vet    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:peä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:peä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:peä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:pes   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pes   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:vet   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:ven   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ve   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vet   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:vet   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_KIRVOTA
!! € kirvota
0:vot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:vot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:poa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:poa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:poa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:vot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:von   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:vo   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:vot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:vot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_KADOTA
!! € kadota
0:dot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:dot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:toa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:toa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:toa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:dot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:don   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:do   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:dot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_TODETTU
!! € todeta
0:det    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:det    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:tea     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tea   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tea   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tes   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tes   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:det   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:den   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:det   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_VYYHDETÄ
!! € vyyhdetä
0:det    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:det    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:teä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:teä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:teä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:tes   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tes   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:det   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:den   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:de   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:det   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:det   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_LIIDUTA
!! € liiduta
0:dut    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:dut    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:tua     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:tua   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:tua   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tus   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tus   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:dut   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:dun   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:du   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:dut   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:dut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_TUNGETA
!! € tungeta
0:get    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:get    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:kea     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:kea   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:kea   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:kes   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kes   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:get   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:gen   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ge   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:get   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:get   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_PINGOTA
!! € pingota
0:got    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:got    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:koa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:koa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:koa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:kos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:got   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:gon   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:go   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:got   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:got   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_ÄNGETÄ
!! € ängetä
0:get    V_FRONT_AINF    ;
0:get    V_FRONT_EINF  ;
0:keä     V_FRONT_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:keä   V_FRONT_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:keä   V_FRONT_3SG_Ä          ;
0:kes   V_FRONT_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:kes   V_FRONT_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:get   V_FRONT_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:gen   V_FRONT_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:ge   V_FRONT_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:get   V_FRONT_PASSIVE    ;
0:get   V_FRONT_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_KUMMUTA
!! € kummuta
0:mut    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:mut    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pua     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pua   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pua   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pus   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pus   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:mut   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:mun   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:mu   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:mut   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:mut   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_KAMMETA
!! € kammeta
0:met    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:met    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:pea     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:pea   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:pea   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pes   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pes   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:met   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:men   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:me   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:met   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:met   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_SAMMOTA
!! € sammota
0:mot    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:mot    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:poa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:poa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:poa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:pos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:pos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:mot   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:mon   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:mo   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:mot   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:mot   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;

LEXICON V_INNOTA
!! € innota
0:not    V_BACK_AINF    ;
0:not    V_BACK_EINF  ;
0:toa     V_BACK_WEAK_PRESENT  ;
0:toa   V_BACK_STRONG_PRESENT    ;
0:toa   V_BACK_3SG_A          ;
0:tos   V_BACK_WEAK_PAST    ;
0:tos   V_BACK_STRONG_PAST    ;
0:not   V_BACK_IMPERATIVE   ;
0:non   V_BACK_POTENTIAL_N  ;
0:no   V_BACK_PASSIVE_T    ;
0:not   V_BACK_PASSIVE    ;
0:not   V_BACK_TUPCP_0  ;
